West Virginia, session 2025, HB3085.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 64. ORAL HEALTH AND CANCER RIGHTS ACT. §33-64-1. Oral health and cancer rights act; dental and medical oral health coverage required; use of specific billing modifier; and effective date. (a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the Oral Health and Cancer Rights Act.(b) Every health benefit plan offered by an insurer shall provide coverage for oral health procedures that are necessary to receive or are the result of cancer treatments including surgery, chemotherapy, biotherapy, pharmacology, immunotherapy, or radiation.(c) The coverage required under this section shall include evaluations, examinations, patient education, laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, restoration, rehabilitation, medical devices, and prosthesis needed to obtain cancer treatment or restore whole or partial function associated with eating, breathing, voice, speech, and swallowing related to a cancer diagnosis.(d) All cancer-related dental and oral health procedures that are part of a patient's care or survivorship plan as determined in consultation with the attending healthcare provider shall be billed using the billing modifier, "West Virginia Code §33-64-1" in conjunction with each applicable billing code. The modifier signifies eligibility of coverage for all clinical service billing codes used for dental or medical oral health, evaluations, examinations, patient education, laboratory assessments, treatments, restoration, rehabilitation, medical devices, and prosthesis needed to obtain cancer treatment or to restore whole or partial function associated with eating, breathing, voice, speech, and swallowing related to a cancer diagnosis. Procedures or visits billed with this modifier are considered covered services as outlined in this section. As medications are unable to be billed with modifiers in West Virginia, pharmacists will be notified of medications that qualify for coverage under this act by using a unique identifier "West Virginia Code §33-64-1" on the prescription.  (e) This article becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to all health insurance contracts that are nonexempt from the Affordable Care Act.